Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1716
Massage therapy establishment; license required.

No person shall operate or profess or attempt to operate a massage therapy establishment unless such establishment is licensed by the department under the Massage Therapy Practice Act. The department shall not issue or renew a license for a massage therapy establishment until all requirements of the act have been complied with. No person shall engage in any of the practices of massage therapy in any location or premises other than a licensed massage therapy establishment except as specifically permitted in the act or in the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 11.
July 18, 2026